Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 7
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION IN NONURBANIZED AREAS

43-1-701. Public transportation projects in nonurbanized areas.

The department of transportation and the executive director thereof are designated and authorized to take all steps and adopt all proceedings necessary to make and enter into such contracts or agreements as may be necessary for state application and administration of the "Federal Transit Act", 49 U.S.C. sec. 5311, designated for public transportation projects in areas other than urbanized areas. The department of transportation shall prepare a program of such projects for submission to the secretary of transportation, which shall provide for a fair and equitable distribution of funds within the state and may include distributions to the state, municipalities, counties, and special districts organized for transportation purposes.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1594, § 1, effective June 22.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1097, § 121, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1916, § 138, effective August 5.

43-1-702. Rules and regulations.

The department of transportation is authorized to promulgate necessary rules and regulations in order to carry out the purposes of this part 7.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1594, § 1, effective June 22.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1097, § 122, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For promulgation of rules and regulations, see article 4 of title 24.